Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.172

Prototypical funding allocation model—Determination of educational system's capacity to accommodate increased resources—Identification of limitations—Reports.

(1) As part of the estimates and information submitted to the governor by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.300.170, the superintendent of public instruction shall biennially make determinations on the educational system's capacity to accommodate increased resources in relation to the elements in the prototypical funding allocation model. In areas where there are specific and significant capacity limitations to providing enhancements to a recommended element, the superintendent of public instruction shall identify those limitations and make recommendations on how to address the issue.

(2) The legislature shall:

(a) Review the recommendations of the superintendent of public instruction submitted under subsection (1) of this section; and

(b) Use the information as it continues to review, evaluate, and revise the definition and funding of basic education in a manner that serves the educational needs of the citizens of Washington; continues to fulfill the state's obligation under Article IX of the state Constitution and ensures that no enhancements are imposed on the educational system that cannot be accommodated by the existing system capacity.

(3) "System capacity" for purposes of this section includes, but is not limited to, the ability of schools and districts to provide the capital facilities necessary to support a particular instructional program, the staffing levels necessary to support an instructional program both in terms of actual numbers of staff as well as the experience level and types of staff available to fill positions, the higher education systems capacity to prepare the next generation of educators, and the availability of data and a data system capable of helping the state allocate its resources in a manner consistent with evidence-based practices that are shown to improve student learning.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the legislature on a biennial basis beginning December 1, 2010.

[ 2009 c 548 s 113.]

NOTES:

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.